Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Chapter 12
UNIFORM POWER OF ATTORNEY ACT

Part 1. General Provisions and Definitions

Sec.

Part 2. Authority

Part 3. Statutory Forms

Part 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

Article 1 — General Provisions and Definitions

Article 1 — General Provisions and Definitions — Section 102 [§ 15-12-102] lists definitions which are useful in interpretation of the Act. Of particular note is the definition of “incapacity” which replaces the term “disability” used in the Original Act. The definition of “incapacity” is consistent with the standard for appointment of a conservator under Section 401 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act as amended in 1997. Another significant change in terminology from the Original Act is the use of “agent” in place of the term “attorney in fact.” The term “agent” was also used in the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act (1988) and is intended to clarify confusion in the lay public about the meaning of “attorney in fact.” Section 103 [§ 15-12-103] provides that the Act is to apply broadly to all powers of attorney, but excepts from the Act powers of attorney for health care and certain specialized powers such as those coupled with an interest or dealing with proxy voting.

Another innovation is the default rule in Section 104 [§ 15-12-104] that a power of attorney is durable unless it contains express language indicating otherwise. This change from the Original Act reflects the view that most principals prefer their powers of attorney to be durable as a hedge against the need for guardianship. While the Original Act was silent on execution requirements for a power of attorney, Section 105 [§ 15-12-105] requires the principal’s signature and provides that an acknowledged signature is presumed genuine. Section 106 recognizes military powers of attorney and powers of attorney properly executed in other states or countries, or which were properly executed in the state of enactment prior to the Act’s effective date. Section 107 [§ 15-12-107] states a choice of law rule for determining the law that governs the meaning and effect of a power of attorney.

Section 108 [§ 15-12-108] addresses the relationship of the agent to a later court-appointed fiduciary. The Original Act conferred upon a conservator or other later-appointed fiduciary the same power to revoke or amend the power of attorney as the principal would have had prior to incapacity. In contrast, the Act reserves this power to the court and states that the agent’s authority continues until limited, suspended, or terminated by the court. This approach reflects greater deference for the previously expressed preferences of the principal and is consistent with the state legislative trend that has departed from the Original Act.

The default rule for when a power of attorney becomes effective is stated in Section 109. [§ 15-12-109] Unless the principal specifies that it is to become effective upon a future date, event, or contingency, the authority of an agent under a power of attorney becomes effective when the power is executed. Section 109 [§ 15-12-109] permits the principal to designate who may determine when contingent powers are triggered. If the trigger for contingent powers is the principal’s incapacity, Section 109 [§ 15-12-109] provides that the person designated to make that determination has the authority to act as the principal’s personal representative under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) for purposes of accessing the principal’s health-care information and communicating with the principal’s health-care provider. This provision does not, however, confer on the designated person the authority to make health-care decisions for the principal. If the trigger for contingent powers is incapacity but the principal has not designated anyone to make the determination, or the person authorized is unable or unwilling to make the determination, the determination may be made by a physician or licensed psychologist, who must find that the principal’s ability to manage property or business affairs is impaired, or by an attorney at law, judge, or appropriate governmental official, who must find that the principal is missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States.
The bases for termination of a power of attorney are covered in Section 110 [§ 15-12-110]. In response to concerns expressed in the JEB survey, the Act provides as the default rule that authority granted to a principal’s spouse is revoked upon the commencement of proceedings for legal separation, marital dissolution or annulment.

Sections 111 through 118 [§§ 15-12-111 through 15-12-118] address matters related to the agent, including default rules for coagents and successor agents (Section 111 [§ 15-12-111]), reimbursement and compensation (Section 112 [§ 15-12-112]), an agent’s acceptance of appointment (Section 113 [§ 15-12-113]), and the agent’s duties (Section 114 [§ 15-12-114]). Section 115 [§ 15-12-115] provides that a principal may lower the standard of liability for agent conduct subject to a minimum level of accountability for actions taken dishonestly, with an improper motive, or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the power of attorney or the best interest of the principal. Section 116 [§ 15-12-116] sets out a comprehensive list of persons that may petition the court to review the agent’s conduct and Section 117 [§ 15-12-117] addresses agent liability. An agent may resign by following the notice procedures described in Section 118 [§ 15-12-118].

Sections 119 and 120 [§ 15-12-119 and 15-12-120] are included in the Act to address the frequently reported problem of persons refusing to accept a power of attorney. Section 119 [§ 15-12-119] protects persons that in good faith accept an acknowledged power of attorney without actual knowledge that the power of attorney is revoked, terminated, or invalid or that the agent is exceeding or improperly exercising the agent’s powers. Subject to statutory exceptions, alternative Sections 120 [§ 15-12-120] impose liability for refusal to accept a power of attorney. Alternative A sanctions refusal of an acknowledged power of attorney and Alternative B sanctions only refusal of an acknowledged statutory form power of attorney [Idaho adopted Alternative A.].

Sections 121 through 123 [§§ 15-12-121 through 15-12-123] address the relationship of the Act to other law. Section 121 [§ 15-12-121] clarifies that the Act is supplemented by the principles of common law and equity to the extent those principles are not displaced by a specific provision of the Act, and Section 122 [§ 15-12-122] further clarifies that the Act is not intended to supersede any law applicable to financial institutions or other entities. With respect to remedies, Section 123 [§ 15-12-123] provides that the remedies under the Act are not exclusive and do not abrogate any other cause of action or remedy that may be available under the law of the enacting jurisdiction.

Article 2 — Authority

Article 2 — Authority — The Act offers the drafting attorney enhanced flexibility whether drafting an individually tailored power of attorney or using the statutory form. Like the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act, Sections 204 through 217 [§§ 15-12-204 through 15-12-217] of the Act set forth detailed descriptions of authority relating to subjects such as “real property,” “retirement plans,” and “taxes,” which a principal, pursuant to Section 202 [§ 15-12-202], may incorporate in full into the power of attorney either by a reference to the short descriptive term for the subject used in the Act or to the section number. Section 202 [§ 15-12-202] further states that a principal may modify in a power of attorney any authority incorporated by reference. The definitions in Article 2 also provide meaning for authority with respect to subjects enumerated on the optional statutory form in Article 3. Section 203 applies to all incorporated authority and grants of general authority, providing further detail on how the authority is to be construed. Article 2 also addresses concerns about authority that might be used to dissipate the principal’s property or alter the principal’s estate plan. Section 201(a) [§ 15-12-201(1)] lists specific categories of authority that cannot be implied from a grant of general authority, but which may be granted only through express language in the power of attorney. Section 201(b) [§ 15-12-201(2)] contains a default rule prohibiting an agent that is not an ancestor, spouse, or descendant of the principal from creating in the agent or in a person to whom the agent owes a legal obligation of support an interest in the principal’s property, whether by gift, right of survivorship, beneficiary designation, disclaimer, or otherwise.

Article 3 — Statutory Forms

Article 3 — Statutory Forms — The optional form in Article 3 is designed for use by lawyers as well as lay persons. It contains, in plain language, instructions to the principal and agent. Step-by-step prompts are given for designation of the agent and successor agents, and grant of general and specific authority. In the section of the form addressing general authority, the principal must initial the subjects over which the principal wishes to delegate general authority to the agent. In the section of the form addressing specific authority, the Section 201(a) [§ 15-12-201(1)] categories of specific authority are listed, preceded by a warning to the principal about the potential consequences of granting such authority to an agent. The principal is instructed to initial only the specific categories of actions that the principal intends to authorize. Article 3 also contains a sample agent certification form.

Article 4 — Miscellaneous Provisions